Massachusetts, session 194th, H5616.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1. Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, the 
commonwealth, acting by and through the Massachusetts Department of Transportation, may 
take for highway purposes, certain parcels of land located in the city of Woburn and the town of 
Burlington, held in trust by the city of Boston’s Treasury department, being temporary 
construction areas of 4,603 square feet and permanent easements of 8,917 square feet and shown 
on a plan of land entitled “Massachusetts Department of Transportation Highway Division 
Intersection Improvement Project Cambridge Road at South Bedford Street and Bedford Road in 
the city and town of Woburn/Burlington, Middlesex County Preliminary Right of Way Plans”, 

of 2 9 dated May 27, 2026, to be filed with the chief engineer of the highway division of the 
Massachusetts Department of Transportation and recorded with the Middlesex north registry of 
deeds. 
SECTION 2. In anticipation of and as planned mitigation for the takings described in 
section 1 and to ensure a no-net-loss of land subject to Article 97 of the Amendments to the 
Constitution of the Commonwealth, during the May 25, 2025 approval of a special permit to 
Jumbo Self Storage, LLC - Jumbo Capital Management for land being located at 7 Wheeler road 
in the town of Burlington and shown on the town’s assessor’s Map 52 as parcels 4 and 6, the 
town of Burlington required that land be set aside for future improvements to the intersection of 
Cambridge road at South Bedford street and Bedford road to satisfy Article 97. The town of 
Burlington further accepted a conservation restriction from Wheeler Self Storage, LLC on the 
Wheeler road property containing approximately 9 acres, recorded with the Middlesex south 
registry of deeds at book 78014, page 433. As described in conditions G and H of a special 
permit decision granted by the town of Burlington’s planning board and recorded with the 
Middlesex south registry of deeds at book 71169 and page 469, said conveyance was specifically 
intended to be mitigation for the transfer described in section 1 and the Mary Cummings Trust, 
by and through the city of Boston, does not oppose the mitigation proposed by the Massachusetts 
Department of Transportation. 
SECTION 3. The Massachusetts Department of Transportation shall assume all costs 
associated with engineering, surveys, appraisals, deed preparation and other expenses necessary 
to execute the takings authorized by this act.